Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 25 Corrosion Prevention and Mitigation Work Requirements

37-25-1.
Corrosion prevention and mitigation work requirements.

For purposes of this section:

“NACE 13/ACS 1 standard” means the Society for Protective Coatings/NACE International standard for an industrial coating and lining application specialist.

“Trained and certified personnel” means both of the following:

To the maximum extent feasible, workers performing surface preparation and application of protective coatings and linings to steel, who are classified as journey-level painters, shall be certified by an organization generally accepted in the industry as meeting the NACE 13/ACS 1 standard, or a similar standard, that is generally accepted in the industry. Coatings applied during assembly are excluded.

Workers performing surface preparation and application of protective coatings and linings to steel, who are classified as apprentices, shall be registered in an industrial apprenticeship program, approved by the department of labor and training, that provides training to meet the NACE 13/ACS 1 standard or a similar standard, that is generally accepted by the industry.

A public entity that awards a contract after January 1, 2024, that is paid for in whole or in part with state funds, shall require all contractors and subcontractors performing corrosion prevention and mitigation work to comply with the standards adopted pursuant to this section.

Contractors and subcontractors performing public works contracts for corrosion prevention and mitigation work must comply with the standards adopted pursuant to this section after January 1, 2024.

On or before January 1, 2023, the director of the department of labor and training in consultation with the department of environmental management, shall adopt regulations establishing standards for the performance of corrosion prevention and mitigation work on public projects that reflect industry best practices. Such industry best practices shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

Use of trained and certified personnel for surface preparation and application of protective coatings and linings to steel;

Use of inspectors to ensure best practices and standards are met; and

A plan to prevent environmental degradation, including, but not limited to, careful handling and containment of hazardous materials including, but not limited to, lead paint.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 83, § 1, effective June 15, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 84, § 1, effective June 15, 2022.